Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Natural Resources Road System

177.971.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

177.972.
Directory of natural resources road system — Collection of information for directory. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

177.973.
Resource recovery road fund — Use of fund — Exemptions. [Repealed.]

177.974.
Expenditure after consultation with local legislators and fiscal court members — Division of funds — Matching funds. [Repealed.]

177.975.
Allocation of funds for reconstruction, maintenance and repair of resource recovery roads and bridges. [Repealed.]